Massachusetts, session 194th, S568.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 91 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “for the purposes of”, in line 36,
the following words:- recreation and.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “Private tidelands” the following definition:-
“Recreation”, the use of land for relaxation, exercise, watersports or other enjoyable
pastimes.
of 1